Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1114
Board; membership.

The board shall have ten members. The members shall consist of two public members; six licensed dentists, including one official or member of the instructional staff from each accredited school or college of dentistry in this state; and two licensed dental hygienists.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 447.